Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 8. Filing And Recording

§ 33-29-801.
Maps, plats, plans and designs for filing or recording to be certified by professional engineer or professional land surveyor; exception; size of maps.

Except for filings with the oil and gas commission pursuant to rules of the oil and gas commission, all maps, plats, plans, designs and all other engineering and surveying documents required to be filed or recorded in the state engineer’s office, the office of state lands and investments, all county clerks’ offices, all city or town offices, or any other office of public record in the state of Wyoming, shall comply with the following requirements:

Be made by or under the responsible charge of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor and be signed by and bear the seal of the professional engineer or professional land surveyor;

Hardcopy originals shall be drawn in either waterproof black ink or acetate ink or shall be an acceptable photographic or other kind of reproduction on good quality polyester base drafting film in a minimum thickness of four-thousandths (.004) inch or as otherwise required by the receiving entity;

Maps formatted as required by the receiving entity may be submitted in electronic form as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

;

Hardcopy documents shall conform to the sizes provided by board rule.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 43 § 2.

The state engineer may adopt rules and regulations which provide exceptions to paragraph (a)(i) of this section for projects which, because of their size, nature or location, an exception would not impede upon public safety or the integrity of a water right.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 43, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendments.—

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, deleted the last sentence of (e), which read: “The exceptions provided pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to the exception provided in subsection (b) of this section.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 43, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted former (b) through (d).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.